Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3290
District; land; use for recreational purposes; fees.

Except as otherwise provided in section 2-3290.01, a district which owns land or has a lease or an easement permitting the use of land for public recreational purposes may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the use of such land as provided in sections 2-3292 to 2-32,100. For purposes of sections 2-3234.01 and 2-3290 to 2-32,101, unless the context otherwise requires, recreation area means land owned by the district or over which a district has a lease or an easement permitting the use thereof for public recreational purposes which the board authorizes to be used for such purposes.

In addition to the authority provided in section 2-3292 to establish and collect fees, a district may establish and collect permit fees for public access to such land.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 15.